Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 49

Interstate Compacts

Cross References. Interstate Commission for Adult Offender Supervision, §12-51-101 et seq.

Subchapter 1

— Interstate Corrections Compact

12-49-101. Title.

This subchapter may be cited as the “Interstate Corrections Compact”.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 315, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-1401.

12-49-102. Text of Interstate Corrections Compact.

The Interstate Corrections Compact is enacted into law and entered into by this state with any other states legally joining therein in the form substantially as follows:

INTERSTATE CORRECTIONS COMPACT

ARTICLE I Purpose and Policy

The party states, desiring by common action to fully utilize and improve their institutional facilities and provide adequate programs for the confinement, treatment, and rehabilitation of various types of offenders, declare that it is the policy of each of the party states to provide such facilities and programs on a basis of cooperation with one another, thereby serving the best interests of such offenders and of society and effecting economies in capital expenditures and operational costs. The purpose of this compact is to provide for the mutual development and execution of such programs of cooperation for the confinement, treatment, and rehabilitation of offenders with the most economical use of human and material resources.

ARTICLE II Definitions

As used in this compact, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(a)

“State” means a state of the United States; the United States of America; a territory or possession of the United States; the District of Columbia; the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico.

(b)

“Sending state” means a state party to this compact in which conviction or court commitment was had.

(c)

“Receiving state” means a state party to this compact to which an inmate is sent for confinement other than a state in which conviction or court commitment was had.

(d)

“Inmate” means a male or female offender who is committed, under sentence to or confined in a penal or correctional institution.

(e)

“Institution” means any penal or correctional facility, including but not limited to a facility for the mentally ill or mentally defective, in which inmates as defined in (d) above may lawfully be confined.

ARTICLE III Contracts

(a)

Each party state may make one or more contracts with any one or more of the other party states for the confinement of inmates on behalf of a sending state in institutions situated within receiving states. Any such contract shall provide for:

1.

Its duration.

2.

Payments to be made to the receiving state by the sending state for inmate maintenance, extraordinary medical and dental expenses, and any participation in or receipt by inmates of rehabilitative or correctional services, facilities, programs, or treatment not reasonably included as part of normal maintenance.

3.

Participation in programs of inmate employment, if any; the disposition or crediting of any payments received by inmates on account thereof; and the crediting of proceeds from or disposal of any products resulting therefrom.

4.

Delivery and retaking of inmates.

5.

Such other matters as may be necessary and appropriate to fix the obligations, responsibilities, and rights of the sending and receiving states.

(b)

The terms and provisions of this compact shall be a part of any contract entered into by the authority of or pursuant thereto, and nothing in any such contract shall be inconsistent therewith.

ARTICLE IV Procedures and Rights

(a)

Whenever the duly constituted authorities in a state party to this compact, and which has entered into a contract pursuant to Article III, shall decide that confinement in, or transfer of an inmate to, an institution within the territory of another party state is necessary or desirable in order to provide adequate quarters and care of an appropriate program of rehabilitation or treatment, said officials may direct that the confinement be within an institution within the territory of said other party state, the receiving state to act in that regard solely as agent for the sending state.

(b)

The appropriate officials of any state party to this compact shall have access, at all reasonable times, to any institution in which it has a contractual right to confine inmates for the purpose of inspecting the facilities thereof and visiting such of its inmates as may be confined in the institution.

(c)

Inmates confined in an institution pursuant to the terms of this compact shall at all times be subject to the jurisdiction of the sending state and may at any time be removed therefrom for transfer to a prison or other institution within the sending state, for transfer to another institution in which the sending state may have a contractual or other right to confine inmates, for release on probation or parole, for discharge, or for any other purpose permitted by the laws of the sending state; provided that the sending state shall continue to be obligated to such payments as may be required pursuant to the terms of any contract entered into under the terms of Article III.

(d)

Each receiving state shall provide regular reports to each sending state on the inmates of that sending state in institutions pursuant to this compact including a conduct record of each inmate and certify said record to the official designated by the sending state, in order that each inmate may have official review of his or her record in determining and altering the disposition of said inmate in accordance with the law which may obtain in the sending state and in order that the same may be a source of information for the sending state.

(e)

All inmates who may be confined in an institution pursuant to the provisions of this compact shall be treated in a reasonable and humane manner and shall be treated equally with such similar inmates of the receiving state as may be confined in the same institution. The fact of confinement in a receiving state shall not deprive any inmate so confined of any legal rights which said inmate would have had if confined in an appropriate institution of the sending state.

(f)

Any hearing or hearings to which an inmate confined pursuant to this compact may be entitled by the laws of the sending state may be had before the appropriate authorities of the sending state, or of the receiving state if authorized by the sending state. The receiving state shall provide adequate facilities for such hearings as may be conducted by the appropriate officials of a sending state. In the event such hearing or hearings are had before officials of the receiving state, the governing law shall be that of the sending state and a record of the hearing or hearings as prescribed by the sending state shall be made. Said record together with any recommendations of the hearing officials shall be transmitted forthwith to the official or officials before whom the hearing would have been had if it had taken place in the sending state. In any and all proceedings had pursuant to the provisions of this subdivision, the officials of the receiving state shall act solely as agents of the sending state and no final determination shall be made in any matter except by the appropriate officials of the sending state.

(g)

Any inmate confined pursuant to this compact shall be released within the territory of the sending state unless the inmate, and the sending and receiving states, shall agree upon release in some other place. The sending state shall bear the cost of such return to its territory.

(h)

Any inmate confined pursuant to the terms of this compact shall have any and all rights to participate in and derive any benefits or incur or be relieved of any obligations or have such obligations modified or his status changed on account of any action or proceeding in which he could have participated if confined in any appropriate institution of the sending state located within such state.

(i)

The parent, guardian, trustee, or other person or persons entitled under the laws of the sending state to act for, advise, or otherwise function with respect to any inmate shall not be deprived of or restricted in his exercise of any power in respect of any inmate confined pursuant to the terms of this compact.

ARTICLE V Acts Not Reviewable in Receiving State: Extradition

(a)

Any decision of the sending state in respect of any matter over which it retains jurisdiction pursuant to this compact shall be conclusive upon and not reviewable within the receiving state, but if at the time the sending state seeks to remove an inmate from an institution in the receiving state there is pending against the inmate within such state any criminal charge or if the inmate is formally accused of having committed within such state a criminal offense, the inmate shall not be returned without the consent of the receiving state until discharged from prosecution or other form of proceeding, imprisonment, or detention for such offense. The duly accredited officers of the sending state shall be permitted to transport inmates pursuant to this compact through any and all states party to this compact without interference.

(b)

An inmate who escapes from an institution in which he is confined pursuant to this compact shall be deemed a fugitive from the sending state and from the state in which the institution is situated. In the case of an escape to a jurisdiction other than the sending or receiving state, the responsibility for institution of extradition or rendition proceedings shall be that of the sending state, but nothing contained herein shall be construed to prevent or affect the activities of officers and agencies of any jurisdiction directed toward the apprehension and return of an escapee.

ARTICLE VI Federal Aid

Any state party to this compact may accept federal aid for use in connection with any institution or program, the use of which is or may be affected by this compact or any contract pursuant hereto and any inmate in a receiving state pursuant to this compact may participate in any such federally aided program or activity for which the sending and receiving states have made contractual provision, provided that if such program or activity is not part of the customary correctional regimen, the express consent of the appropriate official of the sending state shall be required therefor.

ARTICLE VII Entry into Force

This compact shall enter into force and become effective and binding upon the states so acting when it has been enacted into law by any two states. Thereafter, this compact shall enter into force and become effective and binding as to any other of said states upon similar action by such states.

ARTICLE VIII Withdrawal and Termination

This compact shall continue in force and remain binding upon a party state until it shall have enacted a statute repealing the same and providing for the sending of formal written notice of withdrawal from the compact to the appropriate officials of all other party states. An actual withdrawal shall not take effect until one year after the notices provided in said statute have been sent. Such withdrawal shall not relieve the withdrawing state from its obligations assumed hereunder prior to the effective date of withdrawal. Before the effective date of withdrawal, a withdrawing state shall remove to its territory, at its own expense, such inmates as it may have confined pursuant to the provisions of this compact.

ARTICLE IX Other Arrangements Unaffected

Nothing contained in this compact shall be construed to abrogate or impair any agreement or other arrangement which a party state may have with a non-party state for the confinement, rehabilitation, or treatment of inmates nor to repeal any other laws of a party state authorizing the making of cooperative institutional arrangements.

ARTICLE X Construction and Severability

The provisions of this compact shall be liberally construed and shall be severable. If any phrase, clause, sentence, or provision of this compact is declared to be contrary to the constitution of any participating state or of the United States or the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person, or circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this compact and the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person, or circumstance shall not be affected thereby. If this compact shall be held contrary to the constitution of any state participating therein, the compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining states and in full force and effect as to the state affected as to all severable matters.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 315, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-1402.

12-49-103. Director's powers.

The Director of the Department of Correction is authorized and directed to do all things necessary or incidental to the carrying out of the compact in every particular, and he or she may in his or her discretion delegate this authority to other appropriate officials under his or her employ.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 315, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-1403.

Subchapter 2

— South Central Interstate Corrections Compact

12-49-201. Signing and ratification — Terms.

The Governor on behalf of this state is authorized to execute a compact, in substantially the following form, with any one (1) or more of the states of Alabama, Florida, Georgia, Kansas, Kentucky, Louisiana, Mississippi, Missouri, Oklahoma, Tennessee, and Texas, and the General Assembly hereby signifies in advance its approval and ratification of the compact:

SOUTH CENTRAL INTERSTATE CORRECTIONS COMPACT

Article I Purpose

The party states find that special problems involved in the incarceration of women prisoners make it impracticable for each state to provide facilities and programs of sufficiently high quality for the confinement, treatment, and rehabilitation of women prisoners in accordance with recognized penological standards. Accordingly, it is the policy of each of the party states to provide such programs and facilities on a basis of co-operation with one another thereby making possible the operation and maintenance of correctional institutions for women on an efficient basis that will promote the best interest of women prisoners and of society as a whole. To these ends, the purpose of this Compact is to provide adequate care and rehabilitation of women prisoners, in the South Central States through effective interstate co-operation.

Article II Definitions

A.

As used in this Compact, the term “sending state” shall mean a state party to this Compact in which conviction was had.

B.

As used in this Compact, the term “receiving state” shall mean a state party to this Compact to which a prisoner is sent for incarceration other than the state in which conviction was had.

C.

A “woman prisoner” as used herein is any female prisoner who has been convicted of a criminal offense and is subject to commitment under the laws of a sending state.

Article III Board Created

There is hereby created the South Central Interstate Corrections Board, an agency of the states party to this Compact, with the powers and duties conferred upon it by this Compact. The Board shall be composed of two members from each party state to be designated and to serve as provided by the law of such state. At least one member from each party state shall be an officer of an administrative agency of such state dealing with penal or correctional institutions.

Article IV Board Powers and Duties

The Board shall have power to:

1.

Study interstate problems in the corrections fields and recommend such measures as it may deem necessary for administrative or legislative action by the party states.

2.

Study and recommend groupings of the party states with respect to the use of each Compact Institution as defined herein so as to facilitate the most efficient service of the area, use of the institution, and care and rehabilitation of the prisoners.

3.

Receive from time to time and review reports from each receiving state concerning costs, methods, practices, rehabilitation programs, and returns from programs of prisoner employment, if any, in the Compact Institutions and make general recommendations as to the administration of the interstate program in such institutions.

4.

Receive copies of all contracts between or among party states entered into pursuant to this Compact and make general recommendations as to procedures, practices, and contract provisions.

5.

Receive and expend for the purposes of this Compact any funds that a party state may from time to time appropriate and make such accounting therefor as the party state may require.

Article V Board Meetings, Rules, Expenses

The Board shall meet at least once each year and shall elect annually from among its members a chairman, vice-chairman, and secretary. The Board shall adopt rules and regulations for the conduct of its business. The expenses of each Board member and of such other persons who may attend meetings of the Board or its panels or committees on behalf of a state shall be met by that state in accordance with its law.

Article VI Contracts and Reports

A.

The appropriate administrative agencies of the party states may enter into contracts consistent with and embodying the standards contained in this Compact covering in specific terms the charge or charges of the receiving state for prisoner care and the obligations of the sending and receiving states for delivery and retaking of prisoners and for services which shall be rendered, for duration of contract, and for all other necessary matters.

B.

The representatives on the Board of any group of states which have entered into arrangements with respect to a Compact Institution may constitute a panel of the Board which shall have the power to make recommendations regarding that institution.

C.

An appropriate administrative officer in each state within which a Compact Institution is located shall make annual reports to the Board as to the loads, costs, methods, practices, rehabilitation programs, and returns from programs of prisoner employment, if any, in such Compact Institution including such recommendations as to these matters and as to the interstate program as such administrator may deem advisable.

D.

Copies of all contracts entered into under this article shall be filed with the Board in such manner as it may prescribe.

Article VII Reports to Governors and Legislatures

The Board shall report annually to the Governors and legislatures of the party states concerning all activities under this Compact and such recommendations for action by the party states as the Board shall deem necessary.

Article VIII Rights and Duties of Sending and Receiving States

A.

Whenever the duly constituted judicial or administrative authorities in a state party to the Compact and which has entered a contract under Article VI, shall decide that incarceration of a woman prisoner within the territory of another party state is necessary in order to provide adequate quarters and care or desirable in order to provide the best available program of rehabilitation said officials may direct that the incarceration be within a prison or other correctional institution within the territory of said other party state, such receiving state to act in that regard solely as agent for the sending state.

B.

Upon the request of the South Central Interstate Corrections Board established by Article III of this Compact, any state which adopts this Compact may designate a correctional institution for women within said state as a “Compact Institution” wherein other party states may incarcerate women prisoners whenever contracts therefor shall be made pursuant to Article VI of this Compact. The appropriate administrative and legislative officials of any state party to this Compact shall have access to any Compact Institution at all reasonable times for the purpose of inspecting the facilities thereof and visiting such of its prisoners as may be confined in the institution.

C.

Persons confined in a Compact Institution pursuant to the terms of this Compact shall at all times be subject to the jurisdiction of the sending state and may at any time be removed from said Compact Institution for transfer to a prison or other correctional institution within the sending state, for transfer to another Compact Institution, for release on probation or parole, for discharge, or for any other purpose permitted by the laws of the sending state, provided that the sending state shall continue to be obligated to such payments as may be provided pursuant to the terms of any contracts entered into under the provisions of Article VI.

D.

Each receiving state shall provide regular reports to each sending state on the inmates of that sending state in the Compact Institution including a conduct record of each inmate and certify said record to the official designated by the sending state, in order that each inmate may have the benefit of her record in determining and altering the disposition of said inmate in accordance with the law which may obtain in the sending state and in order that the same may be a source of information for the sending state.

E.

All persons who may be confined in a Compact Institution pursuant to the provisions of this Compact shall be treated in a reasonable and humane manner. The fact of incarceration in a receiving state shall not deprive any person so incarcerated of any legal rights which said person would have had if incarcerated in an appropriate institution of the sending state.

F.

Any hearing or hearings to which a prisoner incarcerated pursuant to this Compact may be entitled by the laws of the sending state may be had before the appropriate authorities of the sending state or of the receiving state if authorized by the sending state. The receiving state shall provide adequate facilities for such hearings as may be conducted by the appropriate officials of a sending state. In the event that such hearing or hearings are had before officials of the receiving state, the governing law shall be that of the sending state and a record of the hearing or hearings as prescribed by the sending state shall be made. Said record together with any recommendations of the hearing officials shall be transmitted forthwith to the official or officials before whom the hearing would have been had if it had taken place in the sending state. In any and all proceedings had pursuant to the provisions of this subdivision, the officials of the receiving state shall act solely as agents of the sending state and no final determination shall be made in any matter except by the appropriate officials of the sending state. Costs of records made pursuant to this subdivision shall be borne by the sending state.

G.

Any person incarcerated under the terms of this Compact shall be released within the territory of the sending state unless the prisoner and the sending and receiving states shall agree upon release in some other place. The sending state shall bear the cost of such return to its territory.

Article IX When Effective

This Compact shall enter into force and become effective and binding upon the states so acting when it has been enacted by any two of the States of Alabama, Arkansas, Florida, Georgia, Kansas, Kentucky, Louisiana, Mississippi, Missouri, Oklahoma, Tennessee, and Texas, and, thereafter, shall enter into force and become effective and binding as to any other of said states upon similar action by such other state.

Article X Withdrawal

This Compact shall continue in force and remain binding upon a party state until the legislature or Governor of such state, as its laws shall provide, takes action to withdraw therefrom. Such action shall not be effective until two years after the notice thereof has been sent by the Governor of the state desiring to withdraw to the Governors of all the other states then party to the Compact. Such withdrawal shall not relieve the withdrawing state from its obligations assumed hereunder prior to the effective date of withdrawal. Before the effective date of withdrawal a withdrawing state shall remove to its territory at its own expense such prisoners as it may have incarcerated pursuant to the provisions of this Compact.

Article XI Severability

The provisions of this Compact shall be severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence, or provision of this Compact is declared to be unconstitutional or the applicability thereof to any state, agency, person, or circumstance is held invalid, the constitutionality of this Compact and the applicability thereof to any other state, agency, person, or circumstance shall not be affected thereby. It is intended that the provisions of this Compact be reasonable and liberally construed.

History.

Acts 1957, No. 361, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-1001.

12-49-202. When compact effective — Exchange of documents.

When the Governor shall have executed the Compact on behalf of this state and, shall have caused a verified copy thereof to be filed with the Secretary of State, and, when the Compact shall have been ratified by one (1) or more of the states named in § 12-49-201, then the Compact shall become operative and effective as between this state and such other state or states.

The Governor is authorized and directed to take such action as may be necessary to complete the exchange of official documents as between this state and any other state ratifying the Compact.

Cross References. Criminal justice centers, §12-41-201 et seq.

A.C.R.C. Notes. This subchapter has been transferred to §12-76-201 et seq.

Effective Dates. Acts 1987, No. 427, § 13: Mar. 26, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “The General Assembly hereby finds and declares that adequate and modern facilities are essential to the safety and welfare of the people of this state; and that adequate and modern facilities need to be made available and that the most feasible and least expensive way of financing and acquiring the same is by authorizing cooperative endeavors and private management under the authority of this act. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be effective upon its passage and approval.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 1957, No. 361, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-1002.

Subchapter 3

— Bi-State Criminal Justice Center Compact

12-49-301. Text of Bi-State Criminal Justice Center Compact.

SECTION 1

Click to view form.The State of Arkansas hereby relinquishes exclusive jurisdiction over the portion of the plant and facility of the Bi-State Criminal Justice Center which is located within the geographical boundary of the said state.

SECTION 2

Click to view form.The State of Texas hereby relinquishes exclusive jurisdiction over the portion of the plant and facility of the Bi-State Criminal Justice Center which is located within the geographical boundary of the said state.

SECTION 3

Click to view form.The States of Arkansas and Texas hereby recognize the existence of concurrent jurisdiction over the geographical areas of both states which are within the Bi-State Criminal Justice Center.

SECTION 4

Click to view form.The State of Arkansas recognizes that an inmate apprehended and charged in Texas maintains a jurisdictional situs (with Texas) within his person and extending to objects under his control, while incarcerated in the Bi-State facility.

SECTION 5

Click to view form.The State of Texas recognizes that an inmate apprehended and charged in Arkansas maintains a jurisdictional situs (with Arkansas) within his person and extending to objects under his control, while incarcerated in the Bi-State facility.

SECTION 6

Click to view form.The States of Arkansas and Texas mutually agree to refrain from taking custody of any inmate, for an offense committed prior to incarceration in the Bi-State facility, while that inmate is in custody of the other state, except through proper extraditionary proceedings.

SECTION 7

Click to view form.The States of Arkansas and Texas mutually agree to refrain from serving any inmate of the Bi-State facility in the custody of the other state, with civil process relating to a suit arising before incarceration, except in accordance with proper civil procedure statutes.

SECTION 8

Click to view form.The State of Arkansas grants use of its facility to the State of Texas for the purposes of establishing the venue of Bowie County within the concurrent jurisdiction of the facility in courtrooms situated geographically on the Arkansas side.

SECTION 9

Click to view form.The State of Texas grants use of its facility to the State of Arkansas for the purpose of establishing the venue of Miller County within the concurrent jurisdiction of the facility in courtrooms situated geographically on the Texas side.

SECTION 10

Click to view form.This Compact shall come into force and become effective and binding upon the states when it has been enacted into law by both states.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 19, §§ 1-10; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-1501.

Subchapter 4

— Emergency Management Assistance Compact [Transferred]

12-49-401. [Transferred.]

12-49-402. [Transferred.]